Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1612] Use of data
reflecting recent conditions in impact fee calculations. (a) Every three
years beginning in 2010, the department shall concurrently update the
following:

(1) School site area averages, using the total school
land requirement for each individual in a school impact district as calculated
pursuant to section 302A-1606(b);

(2) Elementary, middle or intermediate, and high
school permanent facility construction costs per student, as provided under
section 302A-1607; and

(3) Revenue credit per unit figures provided pursuant
to section 302A-1607(e).

(b) Every three years following the initial
determinations made pursuant to section 302A-1604, the department shall update
the following:

(1) Student generation rates for each established
school impact district; and

(2) The statewide level of service.

(c) Every three years beginning in 2010, the
department shall, where appropriate, update the list of cost factors for the
twenty-six geographically limited cost districts, as provided in section
302A-1607(d), by incorporating any changes to the cost factors that have been
made by the department of accounting and general services.

(d) If any data update required by this
section is not completed within the specified time, the most current data shall
be used until the update is completed. [L 2010, c 188, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next